Nevada, session 83, SB14.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 178.484 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.484 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person arrested for an offense other than murder of the first degree
must be admitted to bail.
2. A person arrested for a felony who has been released on
probation or parole for a different offense must not be admitted to
bail unless:
(a) A court issues an order directing that the person be admitted
to bail;
(b) The State Board of Parole Commissioners directs the
detention facility to admit the person to bail; or
(c) The Division of Parole and Probation of the Department of
Public Safety directs the detention facility to admit the person to
bail.
3. A person arrested for a felony or a battery that constitutes
domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018 whose sentence has
been suspended pursuant to NRS 4.373 or 5.055 for a different
offense or who has been sentenced to a term of residential
confinement pursuant to NRS 4.3762 or 5.076 for a different offense
must not be admitted to bail unless:
(a) A court issues an order directing that the person be admitted
to bail; or
(b) A department of alternative sentencing directs the detention
facility to admit the person to bail.
4. A person arrested for murder of the first degree may be
admitted to bail unless the proof is evident or the presumption great
by any competent court or magistrate authorized by law to do so in
the exercise of discretion, giving due weight to the evidence and to
the nature and circumstances of the offense.
5. A person arrested for a violation of NRS 484C.110,
484C.120, 484C.130, 484C.430, 488.410, 488.420 or 488.425 who
is under the influence of intoxicating liquor must not be admitted to
bail or released on the person’s own recognizance unless the person
has a concentration of alcohol of less than 0.04 in his or her breath.
A test of the person’s breath pursuant to this subsection to determine
the concentration of alcohol in his or her breath as a condition of
admission to bail or release is not admissible as evidence against the
person.
-
*SB14*

– 3 –
6. A person arrested for a violation of NRS 484C.110,
484C.120, 484C.130, 484C.430, 488.410, 488.420 or 488.425 who
is under the influence of a controlled substance, is under the
combined influence of intoxicating liquor and a controlled
substance, or inhales, ingests, applies or otherwise uses any
chemical, poison or organic solvent, or any compound or
combination of any of these, to a degree which renders the person
incapable of safely driving or exercising actual physical control of a
vehicle, a power-driven vessel or a sailing vessel under way must
not be admitted to bail or released on the person’s own recognizance
sooner than 12 hours after arrest.
7. A person arrested for a battery that constitutes domestic
violence pursuant to NRS 33.018 must not be admitted to bail
sooner than 12 hours after arrest. If the person is admitted to bail
more than 12 hours after arrest, without appearing personally before
a magistrate or without the amount of bail having been otherwise set
by a magistrate or a court, the amount of bail must be:
(a) Three thousand dollars, if the person has no previous
convictions of battery that constitute domestic violence pursuant to
NRS 33.018 and there is no reason to believe that the battery for
which the person has been arrested resulted in substantial bodily
harm or was committed by strangulation;
(b) Five thousand dollars, if the person has:
(1) No previous convictions of battery that constitute
domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018, but there is reason to
believe that the battery for which the person has been arrested
resulted in substantial bodily harm or was committed by
strangulation; or
(2) One previous conviction of battery that constitutes
domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018, but there is no reason to
believe that the battery for which the person has been arrested
resulted in substantial bodily harm or was committed by
strangulation; or
(c) Fifteen thousand dollars, if the person has:
(1) One previous conviction of battery that constitutes
domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018 and there is reason to
believe that the battery for which the person has been arrested
resulted in substantial bodily harm or was committed by
strangulation; or
(2) Two or more previous convictions of battery that
constitute domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018.
 The provisions of this subsection do not affect the authority of a
magistrate or a court to set the amount of bail when the person
personally appears before the magistrate or the court, or when a
magistrate or a court has otherwise been contacted to set the amount
-
*SB14*

– 4 –
of bail. For the purposes of this subsection, a person shall be
deemed to have a previous conviction of battery that constitutes
domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018 if the person has been
convicted of such an offense in this State or has been convicted of
violating a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits the same or
similar conduct.
8. A person arrested for violating a temporary or extended
order for protection against domestic violence issued pursuant to
NRS 33.017 to 33.100, inclusive, or for violating a restraining order
or injunction that is in the nature of a temporary or extended order
for protection against domestic violence issued in an action or
proceeding brought pursuant to title 11 of NRS, or for violating a
temporary or extended order for protection against stalking,
aggravated stalking or harassment issued pursuant to NRS 200.591,
or for violating a temporary or extended order for protection against
sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.378 must not be admitted to bail
sooner than 12 hours after arrest if:
(a) The arresting officer determines that such a violation is
accompanied by a direct or indirect threat of harm;
(b) The person has previously violated a temporary or extended
order for protection of the type for which the person has been
arrested; or
(c) At the time of the violation or within 2 hours after the
violation, the person has:
(1) A concentration of alcohol of 0.08 or more in the
person’s blood or breath; or
(2) An amount of a prohibited substance in the person’s
blood or urine, as applicable, that is equal to or greater than the
amount set forth in subsection 3 or 4 of NRS 484C.110.
9. If a person is admitted to bail more than 12 hours after
arrest, pursuant to subsection 8, without appearing personally before
a magistrate or without the amount of bail having been otherwise set
by a magistrate or a court, the amount of bail must be:
(a) Three thousand dollars, if the person has no previous
convictions of violating a temporary or extended order for
protection against domestic violence issued pursuant to NRS 33.017
to 33.100, inclusive, or of violating a restraining order or injunction
that is in the nature of a temporary or extended order for protection
against domestic violence issued in an action or proceeding brought
pursuant to title 11 of NRS, or of violating a temporary or extended
order for protection against stalking, aggravated stalking or
harassment issued pursuant to NRS 200.591, or of violating a
temporary or extended order for protection against sexual assault
pursuant to NRS 200.378;
-
*SB14*

– 5 –
(b) Five thousand dollars, if the person has one previous
conviction of violating a temporary or extended order for protection
against domestic violence issued pursuant to NRS 33.017 to 33.100,
inclusive, or of violating a restraining order or injunction that is in
the nature of a temporary or extended order for protection against
domestic violence issued in an action or proceeding brought
pursuant to title 11 of NRS, or of violating a temporary or extended
order for protection against stalking, aggravated stalking or
harassment issued pursuant to NRS 200.591, or of violating a
temporary or extended order for protection against sexual assault
pursuant to NRS 200.378; or
(c) Fifteen thousand dollars, if the person has two or more
previous convictions of violating a temporary or extended order for
protection against domestic violence issued pursuant to NRS 33.017
to 33.100, inclusive, or of violating a restraining order or injunction
that is in the nature of a temporary or extended order for protection
against domestic violence issued in an action or proceeding brought
pursuant to title 11 of NRS, or of violating a temporary or extended
order for protection against stalking, aggravated stalking or
harassment issued pursuant to NRS 200.591, or of violating a
temporary or extended order for protection against sexual assault
pursuant to NRS 200.378.
 The provisions of this subsection do not affect the authority of a
magistrate or a court to set the amount of bail when the person
personally appears before the magistrate or the court or when a
magistrate or a court has otherwise been contacted to set the amount
of bail. For the purposes of this subsection, a person shall be
deemed to have a previous conviction of violating a temporary or
extended order for protection against domestic violence issued
pursuant to NRS 33.017 to 33.100, inclusive, or of violating a
restraining order or injunction that is in the nature of a temporary or
extended order for protection against domestic violence issued in an
action or proceeding brought pursuant to title 11 of NRS, or of
violating a temporary or extended order for protection against
stalking, aggravated stalking or harassment issued pursuant to NRS
200.591, or of violating a temporary or extended order for
protection against sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.378, if the
person has been convicted of such an offense in this State or has
been convicted of violating a law of any other jurisdiction that
prohibits the same or similar conduct.
10. For the purposes of subsections 8 and 9, an order or
injunction is in the nature of a temporary or extended order for
protection against domestic violence if it grants relief that might be
given in a temporary or extended order issued pursuant to NRS
33.017 to 33.100, inclusive.
-
*SB14*

– 6 –
11. As used in this section, “strangulation” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 200.481.
Sec. 2. NRS 178.4845 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.4845 1. Before a court makes a determination of bail
concerning a person, a victim may request that a court issue an order
imposing a condition of release prohibiting contact.
2. A court shall consider a request described in subsection 1.
3. Upon the issuance of an order imposing a condition of
release prohibiting contact, the court shall notify the person subject
to the order that violating the order may result in:
(a) The person being charged with a misdemeanor;
(b) The modification or addition of any condition of release;
(c) The revocation of bail and remand of the person to custody;
or
(d) The imposition of any other penalty prescribed by law.
4. An order imposing a condition of release prohibiting
contact, and any modification thereof, expires within such time, not
to exceed 120 calendar days, as the court fixes.
5. The court may, before the expiration of an order imposing a
condition of release prohibiting contact and upon motion or at the
discretion of the court, after notice and a hearing, renew the order
for good cause shown.
6. After the court issues an order imposing, modifying,
suspending or canceling a condition of release prohibiting contact,
the court shall transmit, as soon as practicable and in a manner
prescribed by the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History, a copy of the order to the Central Repository.
7. A person who knowingly violates an order imposing a
condition of release prohibiting contact is guilty of a misdemeanor.
8. Whether or not a violation of an order imposing a
condition of release prohibiting contact occurs in the presence of
a law enforcement officer, the officer may, with or without a
warrant, arrest and take into custody a person if the officer has
probable cause to believe that:
(a) An order has been issued pursuant to this section against
the person;
(b) The person has received the notice required by subsection
3; and
(c) The person is acting in violation of the order.
9. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a court
to receive a request pursuant to subsection 1 before issuing an order
imposing a condition of release prohibiting contact.
[9.] 10. As used in this section:
-
*SB14*

– 7 –
(a) “Cancel” includes, without limitation, any act that would
effectively terminate a condition of release prohibiting contact,
including, without limitation:
(1) The dismissal of the action or proceeding against the
person;
(2) A prosecuting attorney declining to prosecute the person;
(3) The conviction of the person; or
(4) The acquittal of the person.
(b) “Condition of release prohibiting contact” means a condition
placed on a person who is released pending trial that prohibits the
person from contacting or attempting to contact a specific person or
from causing or attempting to cause another person to contact that
person on the person’s behalf.
Sec. 3. NRS 178.487 is hereby amended to read as follows:
178.487 Every release on bail with or without security is
conditioned upon the defendant’s good behavior while so released,
and upon a showing that the proof is evident or the presumption
great that the defendant has committed a felony or a battery that
constitutes domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018 during the
period of release, the defendant’s bail may be revoked, after a
hearing, by the magistrate who allowed it or by any judge of the
court in which the original charge is pending. Pending such
revocation, the defendant may be held without bail by order of the
magistrate before whom the defendant is brought after an arrest
upon the second charge.
H
-
*SB14*